California, session 20252026, SB1040.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 1465) is added to Division 6 of the Military and Veterans Code, to read: CHAPTER 10.3. Veterans Cemetery Maintenance-Endowment Match Act1465. (a) The department shall establish and administer a state-local matching funds program to strengthen the financial sustainability of veterans cemetery maintenance funds.(b) The program shall require that for every dollar ($1) contributed locally by individuals, veterans service organizations, local governments, or private donors, the state would contribute one dollar ($1) in matching funds, up to $250,000 per veterans cemetery per fiscal year.(c) To be a part of the program, a veterans cemetery shall apply to the department.(d) The department shall do all of the following:(1) Create an application process.(2) Review applications annually.(3) Certify that deposits were made to a veterans maintenance endowment.(4) Transfer matching funds into the same account.(5) Conduct a five-year program review.(e) The department shall require each participating veterans cemetery to submit an annual maintenance and condition report, including balance sheets, expenditures, and deferred maintenance backlog estimates.1466. (a) The Veterans Cemetery Maintenance-Endowment Account is hereby established in the General Fund and shall be administered by the department.(b) Moneys in the account shall be allocated, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the department for distribution pursuant to Section 1465.1467. (a) The department shall provide to the Legislature a report summarizing all participating veterans cemeteries, total state matches, and fund performance.(b) The report shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.1468. Matching funds shall only be available for the maintenance of state, federal, or tribal veterans cemeteries in California.